Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.020

Complaint.

At the time of filing the affidavit the plaintiff shall also file his or her complaint in the action, and thenceforth the action shall proceed as other actions at law, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 206; 1891 c 42 (p 81) s 1; Code 1881 s 637; 1877 p 133 s 640; 1869 p 149 s 577; 1854 p 209 s 419; RRS s 779, part: FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: 1891 c 42 s 2 now codified as RCW 7.44.021.]